en: Plain diet breakfast cereals not fortified
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre nature non enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals very rich in fibre fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner très riches en fibres enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals puffed corn with honey not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Breakfast cereals popped corn with honey not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Boules de maïs soufflées au miel non enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals puffed corn with honey fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Breakfast cereals popped corn with honey fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Boules de maïs soufflées au miel enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals puffed cereals wholemeal fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Breakfast cereals popped cereals wholemeal fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales complètes soufflées enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals mix of puffed cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Breakfast cereals mix of extruded cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Multi-céréales soufflées enrichies en vitamines et minéraux, Multi-céréales extrudées enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Crunchy cereal clusters
fr: Pépites de céréales croustillantes
hr: Hrskave grozdove žitarica
it: Croccanti grappoli di cereali
nl: Krokante mueslis, Krokante muesli

en: Cereal clusters with fruits
fr: Pépites de céréales aux fruits

en: Cereal clusters with chocolate
fr: Pépites de céréales au chocolat

en: Cereal clusters with nuts
fr: Pépites de céréales aux fruits à coques

en: Porridge
de: Haferbrei, Porridge, Haferschleim
es: Gachas, Porridge
fi: Puuro
fr: Porridge
hr: kaša
ja: 粥, ポリッジ
lt: Dribsniai košėms
nl: Pappen
pl: Owsianka
sl: kaša

en: Porridge with fruits
fr: Porridge aux fruits
hr: Kaša s voćem
lt: Dribsniai košėms su vaisiais
nl: Pappen met fruit

en: Porridge with chocolate
fr: Porridge au chocolat
hr: Kaša s čokoladom
lt: Dribsniai košėms su šokoladu
nl: Pappen met chocolade

en: Plain porridge
fr: Porridge nature
hr: Obična kaša
lt: Paprasti dribsniai košėms
nl: Pappen (gewoon)

en: Mueslis, Muesli, Granola
af: Muesli
be: Мюслі
bg: Мюсли
ca: Musli
cs: müsli
da: Müsli
de: Müslis, Müeslis
eo: Muslio
es: Muesli, Mueslis
et: Müsli
eu: Muesli
fi: Mysli
fr: mueslis, müesli, Granolas
gl: Muesli
he: מוזלי
hi: safad musali
hr: Müsli
hu: Müzli, Müzlik
it: Muesli
ja: ミューズリー
ko: 뮈슬리
lo: ມິວສະລີ
lt: Muslis, Granola
ms: Muesli
nb: Müsli
nl: mueslis, Muesli
oc: Muesli
pl: Musli
pt: muesli
ro: Müsli
ru: Мюсли
se: Müsli
sk: müsli
sr: Musli
sv: Müsli
th: มูสลี
tl: Müesli
tr: Müsli
uk: Мюслі
zh: 木斯里

en: Mueslis with fruits
bg: Мюсли с плодове
de: Müslis mit Früchten, Müsli mit Früchten, Früchtemüslis
es: Mueslis con frutas
fi: hedelmämyslit
fr: Mueslis aux fruits
hr: Musli s voćem
it: Muesli alla frutta, muesli con frutta
lt: Muslis su vaisiais
nl: Mueslis met fruit, Muesli met fruit
pt: Mueslis com frutos
ro: Müsli cu fructe
ru: Мюсли с фруктами

en: Mueslis with nuts, Walnut muesli
de: Müslis mit Nüssen
fr: Mueslis aux fruits à coque, Mueslis aux noix
hr: Musli s orasima
it: Muesli con nocciole
lt: Muslis su riešutais
nl: Mueslis met noten
pt: Mueslis com frutos secos

en: Bircher-style mueslis, Muesli flakes, Bircher-style muesli flakes
fr: Mueslis floconneux, Muesli floconneux, Muesli en flocons, Flocons de muesli
hr: Müsli na bircher
lt: Musli dribsniai
nl: Mueslis (Bircher), Birecher Mueslis

en: Bircher-style mueslis with fruits, Bircher-style muesli flakes with fruits
fr: Mueslis floconneux aux fruits, Muesli floconneux aux fruits

en: Bircher-style muesli flakes with fruits not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Bircher-style muesli flakes with dried fruits not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Muesli floconneux aux fruits non enrichi en vitamines et minéraux, Muesli floconneux aux fruits secs non enrichi en vitamines et minéraux